Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-650
Other rights and remedies not limited;
act; how construed.

Nothing in the Dog and Cat Purchase Protection Act shall
limit any rights and remedies otherwise available under the laws of this state.
Any agreement or contract entered into by a seller and a purchaser waiving
any rights under the act is void. Nothing in the Dog and Cat Purchase Protection
Act shall be construed to limit a seller to offering only those warranties,
express or implied, required by the act.

Laws 2009, LB241, § 17.